Louisiana, session 2026, HB895.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1216.1(A)(2)(e) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1216.1. Procedures for survivors of a sexually oriented criminal offense;
immunity; regional plans; maximum allowable costs; definitions; documents
requested by victim
A. All licensed hospitals and healthcare providers in Louisiana shall offer
every sexual assault survivor information to receive the treatment provided for in this
Section. A licensed hospital or healthcare provider shall adhere to the following
procedures if a person presents for treatment as a sexual assault survivor:
* * *
(2) All sexual assault survivors shall be examined and treated, without undue
delay, in a private space required to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of the
survivor by a qualified healthcare provider. Examination and treatment, including
the forensic medical examination, shall be adapted as necessary to address the unique
needs and circumstances of each survivor. All survivors shall be afforded an
advocate whose communications are privileged in accordance with the provisions of
R.S. 46:2187, if one is available. With the consent of the survivor, an advocate shall
remain in the examination room during the forensic medical examination. With the
consent of the survivor, the examination and treatment of all sexual assault survivors
shall, at a minimum, include all of the following:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 895 ENROLLED
(e) Any medication provided during the forensic medical examination, which
may include examination. A healthcare provider shall make available to each
survivor, when medically indicated, emergency contraception and HIV and STI post-
exposure prophylaxis administered in accordance with the Drug Information
Handbook.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.